Utah statutes.
17-53-101.   County officers enumerated.

(1)  The elected officers of a county are:

(a) (i)  in a county operating under a county commission or expanded county commission form of government, county commission members; or

(ii)  in a county operating under one of the other forms of county government under Subsection 17-52-402(1)(a), county legislative body members and the county executive;

(b)  a county treasurer, a sheriff, a county clerk, a county auditor, a county recorder, a county attorney, a district attorney in a county which is part of a prosecution district, a county surveyor, and a county assessor; and

(c)  any others provided by law.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), in counties having a taxable value of less than $100,000,000 the county clerk shall be ex officio auditor of the county and shall perform the duties of the office without extra compensation.

